Hawaii, session 2026, SB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 281-61, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§281-61  Renewals.  (a) Other than for good cause, the renewal of an existing license shall be granted upon the filing of an application; provided that if: (1)  Complaints from the public; (2)  Reports from the commission's investigators; or (3)  Adjudications of the commission or the liquor control adjudication board, indicate that noise created by patrons departing from the premises disturbs residents on the street or of the neighborhood in which the premises are located, or that noise from the premises or adjacent related outdoor areas such as parking lots or lanais exceed standards contained in state or county noise codes or intrudes into nearby residential units, the commission may deny the renewal application or withhold the issuance of a renewed license until corrective measures meeting the commission's approval are taken. (b) The commission or board, pursuant to section 281-17, at the time of renewal or at any time, may revoke, suspend, or place conditions or restrictions on any license issued under this chapter for the purpose of preventing activities within the licensed premises or adjacent areas that are potentially injurious to the health, safety, and welfare of the public and neighborhood including but not limited to criminal activity, including assault, drug dealing, drug use, or prostitution, upon proper notice to the licensee, and a hearing before the commission pursuant to chapter 91. (c)  The commission or board shall deny renewal of a class 2, class 4, class 5, class 6, class 11, class 12, class 13, class 14, class 15, class 17, or class 18 license if the applicant for renewal fails to present proof of the liquor liability insurance required by section 281-31(s). (d) The commission or board shall deny renewal of any liquor license if the applicant for renewal has violated any provision of this chapter on three separate occasions during the twelve-month period preceding the renewal application date." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________